Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2010
Criminalistics laboratory; establish; services included; accreditation.

A criminalistics laboratory is hereby established within the Nebraska State Patrol, under the direction of the Superintendent of Law Enforcement and Public Safety. The laboratory shall perform services necessary for the recognition and proper preservation, identification, and scientific analysis of evidence materials pertaining to the investigation of crimes. By October 1, 2003, the laboratory shall have met the requirements for accreditation by the American Society of Crime Laboratory Directors-LAB-Laboratory Accreditation Board or the National Forensic Science Technology Center and have applied for accreditation.

Laws 1971, LB 477, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1978), § 60-434.01;

Laws 2001, LB 432, § 12.